Alaska statutes. The Constitution of the State of Alaska
Article I Declaration of Rights

Section 1. Inherent Rights.

This constitution is dedicated to the principles that all persons have a natural right to life, liberty, the pursuit of happiness, and the enjoyment of the rewards of their own industry; that all persons are equal and entitled to equal rights, opportunities, and protection under the law; and that all persons have corresponding obligations to the people and to the State.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Board of Fish and Game may provide for area licensing under the provisions of the state constitution. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

Following

State v. Erickson

, 574 P.2d 1 (Alaska 1978), equal protection claims under the Alaska Constitution are measured under a new test which evaluates the importance of the right involved. The more important the right, the greater the burden placed on the state to show that the classification has a fair and substantial relation to a legitimate governmental objective. April 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

The analysis for equal protection claims involves three steps: (1) Ascertaining the purposes of the challenged legislation and determining whether they are legitimate; (2) determining whether the means chosen to accomplish the objectives actually do so; and (3) balancing the importance of the state’s interest in the means chosen against the nature of the right allegedly infringed. April 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

While there clearly are legal challenges which can be mounted to a three-year residence requirement for a grant of state land, a vigorous defense of such a requirement can be made. April 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

Even if the Alaska supreme court views the right to change one’s residence from another state to Alaska as a fundamental right under the Alaska Constitution, this does not mean that a three-year residence requirement for land disposal necessarily violates that fundamental right. To violate the right of interstate migration, it would have to appear that the durational residence requirement in some way penalized the exercise of that right, and a strong argument can be made that conferring eligibility for a grant of state land after three years residence rewards people exercising their right to move to Alaska rather than penalizing them for exercising it. April 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

The basic requirement is that the three-year durational residence requirement have some reasonable basis; that is, that it bear a fair and substantial relation to some legitimate legislative purpose. The more extensive the legislative findings regarding the purpose of such a requirement and the reasons for it, the greater the likelihood that it would be sustained. April 25, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

The Alaska Housing Finance Corporation cannot constitutionally cease making funds available to mortgage companies that are not headquartered in the state. December 26, 1979 Op. Att’y Gen.

A five-year durational residency requirement for eligibility to participate in a state program is clearly unconstitutional and cannot be defended in the absence of a compelling state interest. November 26, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Five-year residency requirements provided for in the subparagraphs of AS

16.10.310(a)(1)

as it existed prior to the 1985 amendment were unconstitutional, since the state’s interest in ensuring that only bona fide resident commercial fishermen qualify for the commercial fishing loan program did not outweigh the infringement on the right of less-than-five-year residents to share in the economic benefits of the program. November 26, 1982 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 2. Source of Government.

All political power is inherent in the people. All government originates with the people, is founded upon their will only, and is instituted solely for the good of the people as a whole.

Opinions of attorney general. —

Alaska Const., art. V, § 1, holding that citizens who meet certain requirements may vote, is one of the provisions that would preclude the banning of write-in votes. The other is this section, which states that government originates with the people and is founded on their will. 1963 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 30.

Section 3. Civil Rights.

No person is to be denied the enjoyment of any civil or political right because of race, color, creed, sex, or national origin. The legislature shall implement this section.

Cross references. —

For provisions prohibiting discrimination based on sex or race in public education, see
AS

14.18.010

—

14.18.110

; for provisions prohibiting discrimination generally, see
AS 18.80.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment effective October 14, 1972 (7th Legislature’s HJR 102 (1972)) inserted “sex” in the first sentence.

Opinions of attorney general. —

This section as implemented by AS 18.80 probably prohibits the state from enacting any laws or adopting any regulations giving special hunting privileges to a class of citizens consisting of Eskimos, Aleuts, and Indians only. January 21, 1981 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 4. Freedom of Religion.

No law shall be made respecting an establishment of religion, or prohibiting the free exercise thereof.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The expenditure of state money in the construction of a hospital operated by a religious nonprofit group under the terms and conditions imposed by the federal government under the Hill-Burton Act is a public purpose and not prohibited by the constitution or laws of Alaska. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 19.

There is no school district action which constitutes the establishment of a religion as long as religious organizations are required to follow the same procedures as other groups in renting school buildings for occasional use, and as long as religious organizations are required to pay the same rental fee. 1966 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 3.

A state employee in a collective bargaining unit who does not belong to an organized religion is entitled to an accommodation of his religious opposition to the payment of union dues. January 13, 1984 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 5. Freedom of Speech.

Every person may freely speak, write, and publish on all subjects, being responsible for the abuse of that right.

Section 6. Assembly; Petition.

The right of the people peaceably to assemble, and to petition the government shall never be abridged.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. I, § 5.

Section 7. Due Process.

No person shall be deprived of life, liberty, or property, without due process of law. The right of all persons to fair and just treatment in the course of legislative and executive investigations shall not be infringed.

Cross references. —

See notes to Alaska Const., art. I, §§ 5 and 11.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Board of Fish and Game may provide for area licensing under the provisions of the state constitution. 1959 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 28.

AS

09.65.210

can be amended to limit the issuance of state tidelands leases for fisheries development to residents of Alaska. 1983 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 03.

Section 8. Grand Jury.

No person shall be held to answer for a capital, or otherwise infamous crime, unless on a presentment or indictment of a grand jury, except in cases arising in the armed forces in time of war or public danger. Indictment may be waived by the accused. In that case the prosecution shall be by information. The grand jury shall consist of at least twelve citizens, a majority of whom concurring may return an indictment. The power of grand juries to investigate and make recommendations concerning the public welfare or safety shall never be suspended.

Cross references. —

See AS

12.40.050

and note thereto.

Section 9. Jeopardy and Self-Incrimination.

No person shall be put in jeopardy twice for the same offense. No person shall be compelled in any criminal proceeding to be a witness against himself.

Section 10. Treason.

Treason against the State consists only in levying war against it, or in adhering to its enemies, giving them aid and comfort. No person shall be convicted of treason, unless on the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or on confession in open court.

Collateral references. —

70 Am.Jur.2d, Sedition, Subversive Activities and Treason, §§ 64 — 67, 71 — 73, 86.

87 C.J.S., Treason, §§ 4 to 12, 15.

Section 11. Rights of Accused.

In all criminal prosecutions, the accused shall have the right to a speedy and public trial, by an impartial jury of twelve, except that the legislature may provide for a jury of not more than twelve nor less than six in courts not of record. The accused is entitled to be informed of the nature and cause of the accusation; to be released on bail, except for capital offenses when the proof is evident or the presumption great; to be confronted with the witnesses against him; to have compulsory process for obtaining witnesses in his favor, and to have the assistance of counsel for his defense.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions guaranteeing right to bail, see AS

12.30.011

.

Section 12. Criminal Administration.

Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel and unusual punishments inflicted. Criminal administration shall be based upon the following: the need for protecting the public, community condemnation of the offender, the rights of victims of crimes, restitution from the offender, and the principle of reformation.

Cross references. —

For appeal of a sentence of imprisonment lawfully imposed, see AS

12.55.120

; for punishments violative of due process, see notes to Alaska Const. art. I, § 7 under analysis line F.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective December 30, 1994 (18th Legislature’s Legislative Resolve No. 58), in the second sentence, substituted “Criminal” for “Penal,” deleted “on the principle of reformation and” following “shall be based,” inserted “the following:,” and added “, community condemnation of the offender, the rights of victims of crimes, restitution from the offender, and the principle of reformation” at the end.

Opinions of attorney general. —

A program authorizing the use of state prisoners on a voluntary basis on governmental public works projects is proper. 1960 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 22.

Section 13. Habeas Corpus.

The privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended, unless when in cases of rebellion or actual or imminent invasion, the public safety requires it.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions related to habeas corpus, see AS 12.75.

Section 14. Searches and Seizures.

The right of the people to be secure in their persons, houses and other property, papers, and effects, against unreasonable searches and seizures, shall not be violated. No warrants shall issue, but upon probable cause, supported by oath or affirmation, and particularly describing the place to be searched, and the persons or things to be seized.

Cross references. —

As to preliminary hearings, see
Alaska Const., art. I, § 11; for statutory provision as to search and seizure, see
AS 12.35.

Section 15. Prohibited State Action.

No bill of attainder or ex post facto law shall be passed. No law impairing the obligation of contracts, and no law making any irrevocable grant of special privileges or immunities shall be passed. No conviction shall work corruption of blood or forfeiture of estate.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The Utility Reimbursement Law is constitutional. 1961 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 12.

Section 16. Civil Suits; Trial by Jury.

In civil cases where the amount in controversy exceeds two hundred fifty dollars, the right of trial by a jury of twelve is preserved to the same extent as it existed at common law. The legislature may make provision for a verdict by not less than three-fourths of the jury and, in courts not of record, may provide for a jury of not less than six or more than twelve.

Section 17. Imprisonment for Debt.

There shall be no imprisonment for debt. This section does not prohibit civil arrest of absconding debtors.

Section 18. Eminent Domain.

Private property shall not be taken or damaged for public use without just compensation.

Cross references. —

For compensation and damages awarded for property taken by eminent domain, see AS

09.55.330

.

Section 19. Right to Keep and Bear Arms.

A well-regulated militia being necessary to the security of a free state, the right of the people to keep and bear arms shall not be infringed. The individual right to keep and bear arms shall not be denied or infringed by the State or a political subdivision of the State.

Effect of amendments. —

The amendment, effective December 30, 1994 (18th Legislature’s Legislative Resolve No. 45), added the second sentence.

Section 20. Quartering Soldiers.

No member of the armed forces shall in time of peace be quartered in any house without the consent of the owner or occupant, or in time of war except as prescribed by law. The military shall be in strict subordination to the civil power.

Collateral references. —

6 C.J.S., Armed Services, §§ 11, 12.

Section 21. Construction.

The enumeration of rights in this constitution shall not impair or deny others retained by the people.

Section 22. Right of Privacy.

The right of the people to privacy is recognized and shall not be infringed. The legislature shall implement this section.

Cross references. —

For the unprivileged nature of communications to physicians or other licensed practitioners in an effort to unlawfully procure controlled substances, see AS

11.71.360

.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect October 14, 1972 (7th Legislature’s HCS SJR 68 (1972).)

Opinions of attorney general. —

A legislative auditor may not examine confidential records on file for state income tax returns and wage information submitted by employees and employers to the Department of Labor in connection with the administration of the State Employment Security Act to determine if persons receiving assistance from the Department of Health and Social Services under their Adult Public Assistance and Aid to families with dependent children were eligible. Such data is within the ambit of protection intended to be afforded the right of privacy under this section of the state constitution. 1972 Alas. Op. Att'y Gen. No. 8.

For discussion of restrictions on Alaska Public Safety Information Network in view of right to privacy under this section, see December 10, 1986 Op. Att’y Gen.

The right to privacy does not prevent division of family and youth services access to adult criminal arrest records for purposes of conducting background investigations of prospective foster parents, day care operators, or others who work with children. January 1, 1989 Op. Att’y Gen.

Section 23. Resident Preference.

This constitution does not prohibit the State from granting preferences, on the basis of Alaska residence, to residents of the State over nonresidents to the extent permitted by the Constitution of the United States.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect January 4, 1989 (15th Legislature’s CSHJR 18 (1988).)

Section 24. Rights of Crime Victims.

Crime victims, as defined by law, shall have the following rights as provided by law: the right to be reasonably protected from the accused through the imposition of appropriate bail or conditions of release by the court; the right to confer with the prosecution; the right to be treated with dignity, respect, and fairness during all phases of the criminal and juvenile justice process; the right to timely disposition of the case following the arrest of the accused; the right to obtain information about and be allowed to be present at all criminal or juvenile proceedings where the accused has the right to be present; the right to be allowed to be heard, upon request, at sentencing, before or after conviction or juvenile adjudication, and at any proceeding where the accused’s release from custody is considered; the right to restitution from the accused; and the right to be informed, upon request, of the accused’s escape or release from custody before or after conviction or juvenile adjudication.

Cross references. —

For statutory provisions related to the rights of crime victims, see AS

12.61.010

.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect December 30, 1994 (18th Legislature’s Legislative Resolve No. 58).

Section 25. Marriage.

To be valid or recognized in this State, a marriage may exist only between one man and one woman.

Effective dates. —

This section took effect January 3, 1999 (the first sentence of the 20th Legislature’s HCS CSSJR 42(RLS).)

Editor’s notes. —

This section consists of the first sentence of 1998 Legislative Resolve 71 (20th Legislature’s HCS CSSJR 42(RLS)).
The second sentence of 1998 Legislative Resolve 71 did not appear on the ballot pursuant to an order of the
Supreme Court of the State of Alaska in

Bess v. Ulmer

, 985 P.2d 979 (Alaska 1999). The same order also prohibited 1998 Legislative Resolve 59 (20th Legislature’s HCS CSSJR 3(FIN)), which related to prisoner’s rights, from appearing on the ballot.